Massachusetts, session 194th, S2864.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special commission to study Chapter 71B and make
recommendations toward the long-term fiscal health and sustainability of Special Education
throughout the Commonwealth, and make recommendations to consider all matters pertaining to
the improvement of fiscal health and educational outcomes. The commission shall examine the
impact and efficacy of special education funding as well as ways to improve the delivery of
special education services in the Commonwealth.
(b) The commission’s review shall evaluate the commonwealth’s current special
education financing structure and delivery and make recommendations to achieve the following
goals:
(1) special education funds shall be sufficient to allow all schools to provide a high
quality education in the least restrictive environment that meets the unique needs of each eligible
student;
of 5

(2) special education funds provided to school districts shall recognize the variation in the
resources that are required to provide students with different disabilities a high quality education;
(3) districts with more students receiving special education services shall equitably
receive more state special education assistance funding than districts with fewer students
receiving special education services;
(4) districts with less local resources shall equitably receive more state special education
assistance funding than districts with more local resources;
(5) special education funds shall be relatively predictable and stable to enable school
districts to budget effectively and implement multi-year plans; Circuit Breaker reimbursement
not less than 90%.
(6) the special education funding system shall promote the efficient use of funds without
incentivizing the under or misdiagnosis of students with disabilities;
(7) the special education funding system shall promote flexibility and innovation in
providing high quality education;
(8) the special education funding system shall limit local financial responsibility for
providing education to students with extraordinary needs; include circuit breaker reimbursement
for Pre-K and kindergarten out of district placements.
(9) the special education funding system shall provide sufficient funds to meet the costs
of transportation of special education students. Circuit Breaker Special Education transportation
reimbursement not less than 90%.
of 5

(10) best practices regarding the delivery of special education services shall be examined
in order to provide an intersectional understanding of the current delivery of education and
services for students with disabilities, and shall take into consideration (i) the social and societal
impacts on the diagnosis of students with disabilities including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity,
gender, immigration status, parents’ education background and socioeconomic status; (ii) a
comprehensive evaluation of existing and potential models for providing education and services
for students with disabilities, in both inclusive in-district and out-of-district settings and the
associated costs and benefits including, but not limited to, the costs of personnel compensation,
transportation, housing, specialized services and supports and assistive technologies; and (iii)
proposed means by which individualized instruction may be provided in an inclusive manner to
all students.
(c) In carrying out the review, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education
shall provide to the commission any data and information relevant to the commission’s charge.
The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall furnish reasonable staff and
other support for the work of the commission.
(d) Prior to issuing its recommendations, the commission shall conduct not fewer than 4
public hearings across regions of the commonwealth.
(e) The special commission shall consist of the chairs of the joint committee on
education, the commissioner of education or designee, one member of the house of
representatives to be appointed by the speaker, one member of the senate to be appointed by the
senate president, and ten members to be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a
representative of the Massachusetts Administrators for Special Education, one of whom shall be
of 5

a representative of the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, one of whom shall be a
representative of the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, one of whom shall
be a member of Parent Teacher Association, one of whom shall be a member of the
Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc., one of whom shall be a member of the
Massachusetts Business Alliance for Education, Inc., one of whom shall be a representative of
the Massachusetts School Counselors Association, one of whom shall be a representative of the
Massachusetts School Administrators Association, one of whom shall be a member of
Massachusetts Organization of Educational Collaboratives, one of whom shall be a member of
Massachusetts Association of School Business Officials, one of whom shall be a representative
of the Massachusetts Teachers Association, and one of whom shall be a representative of
American Federation of Teachers Massachusetts.
(f) It shall not constitute a violation of chapter 268A of the General Laws for a person
employed by a school district to serve on the commission or to participate in commission
deliberations that may have a financial impact on the district employing that person or on the rate
at which that person may be compensated. The commission may establish procedures to ensure
that no such person participates in commission deliberations that may directly affect the school
districts employing those persons or that may directly affect the rate at which those persons are
compensated.
(g) The commission shall file its report with the clerks of the house of representatives and
the senate on or before June 30, 2027. A copy of the report and recommendations shall be made
publicly available on the website of the department of elementary and secondary education and
submitted to the joint committee on education, the joint committee on children, families and
persons with disabilities, and the house and senate committees on ways and means.
of 5

SECTION 2. Section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (c), the number “75”, and
inserting in place thereof the number “80”.
SECTION 3. (b) Section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “threshold.” , the following:
Transportation costs shall be reimbursed at 80%.
of 5